West Virginia, session 2026, HB4560.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 14C. MOTOR FUEL EXCISE TAX. §11-14C-49. West Virginia Division of Natural Resources Law Enforcement Division to receive proceeds from tax on marina and boat dock fuel. Motorboat fuel tax proceeds that are collected from fuel purchased at marinas and boat docks in this state shall be directed to the West Virginia Division of Natural Resources Law Enforcement Division.